Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1487.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-2470.32, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2470.32. Hopi Tribe special plates; fund A. If, by December 31, 2025 2026, a person pays $32,000 to the department for the implementation of this section, the department shall issue Hopi Tribe special plates. The person that provides the $32,000 shall design the Hopi Tribe special plates. The design and color of the Hopi Tribe special plates are subject to approval of the department. The director may allow a request for Hopi Tribe special plates to be combined with a request for personalized special plates. If the director allows such a combination, the request shall be in a form prescribed by the director and is subject to the fees for the personalized special plates in addition to the fees required for the Hopi Tribe special plates. B. Of the $25 fee required by section 28-2402 for the original special plates and for the renewal of special plates, $8 is a special plate administration fee and $17 is an annual donation. C. The department shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, all special plate administration fees in the state highway fund established by section 28-6991 and shall transmit all donations collected pursuant to this section to the Hopi tribal department of public safety and emergency services. The Hopi Tribe shall use these monies for road maintenance services and for traffic control devices that conform to the manual and specifications prescribed in section 28-641 on highways on the Hopi tribal reservation that are located in this state and that are not state highways. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Retroactivity This act applies retroactively to from and after December 30, 2025.